Utah statutes.
41-3-302.   Temporary permits -- Purchasers of motor vehicles -- Penalty for
use after expiration -- Sale and rescission.
(1) (a) (i)  A dealer or the division may issue a temporary permit.
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the administrator shall makes rules for the issuance of a temporary
permit under Subsection (1)(a)(i).
(iii)  The division shall furnish the forms for temporary permits issued by
dealers under Subsection (1)(a)(i).
(b)  A dealer may issue a temporary permit to a bona fide purchaser of a motor
vehicle for a period not to exceed 45 days on a motor vehicle sold to the
purchaser by the dealer.
(c)  The dealer is responsible and liable for the registration fee of each
motor vehicle for which the permit is issued.
(d)  All issued temporary permits that are outstanding after 45 days from the
date they are issued are delinquent and a penalty equal to the registration
fee shall be collected from the issuing dealer.
(2)  If a temporary permit is issued by a dealer under this section and the
sale of the motor vehicle is subsequently rescinded, the temporary permit may
be voided and the issuing dealer is not liable for the registration fee or
penalty.
